New Jersey, session 221, S2429.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Legislature finds and declares that the penalties for young men who disregard their duty to register with the United States Selective Service System are severe, including steep fines and imprisonment.  Failure to register also may permanently preclude a young man from obtaining a variety of federal benefits such as federal employment, federal student financial assistance, participation in federally funded job training programs, and eligibility for United States citizenship for immigrants seeking naturalization. In addition, men who fail to meet the registration requirement forfeit the ability to obtain certain benefits such as State-funded student loans. Therefore, in recognition of the harsh consequences of non-compliance and the importance of ensuring that any future draft is fair and equitable, it is the intent of the Legislature to notify New Jersey residents of their responsibility to register with Selective Service, and to provide them with the opportunity to register concurrently when applying for a drivers license or permit or a nondriver identification card. 2.    A male United States citizen or immigrant who applies for a special learners permit, an examination permit, a probationary drivers license, a basic drivers license, or a nondriver identification card issued pursuant to P.L.1980, c.47 (C.39:3-29.3 et seq.), or for renewal of any license or identification card, and who is less than 26 years of age, shall consent to his registration in compliance with the requirements of the Military Selective Service Act, 50 U.S.C. App. 453. 3.    The chief administrator shall forward the personal information required for registration of applicants pursuant to section 2 of this act to the Selective Service System. The applicants submission of the application shall serve as an indication that he has already registered with the Selective Service or that he is authorizing the chief administrator to forward to the Selective Service the necessary information for such registration. 4.    The chief administrator shall provide written notice on the application that its submission shall serve as the applicants consent to be registered with the Selective Service System pursuant to federal law.  The chief administrator shall provide for the following statement to be printed on the application for a special learners permit, an examination permit, a probationary drivers license, a basic drivers license, or a nondriver identification card: By submitting this application, I am consenting to registration with the Selective Service System if so required by federal law.  If under 18 years of age, I understand that I will be registered as required by federal law when I attain the age of 18 years. 5.    The provisions of this act shall apply to male citizens of the United States and immigrants under the age of 26 years who are applying for the initial issuance, renewal or a duplicate of a special learners permit, an examination permit, a probationary drivers license, a basic drivers license, or a nondriver identification card on or after the effective date of this act. 6.    The chief administrator may promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the provisions of this act pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). 7.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the 12th month after enactment, except that section 6 shall take effect immediately, and the chief administrator, prior to the effective date, may take any needed anticipatory action required for the acts effective implementation.